Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.070

Verification of claim.

A claim must be verified by the real claimant, and no claim shall be filed or prosecuted in the small claims department by the assignee of the claim.

[ 1984 c 258 s 64; 1919 c 187 s 7; RRS s 1777-7.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.